Utah statutes.
53A-2-103.   Transfer of property to new school district -- Rights and obligations of new school board -- Outstanding indebtedness -- Special tax.

(1)  On July 1 following the approval of the creation of a new school district under Section 53A-2-102, the local school boards of the former districts shall convey and deliver all school property to the local school board of the new district.  Title vests in the new board.  All rights, claims, and causes of action to or for the property, for the use or the income from the property, for conversion, disposition, or withholding of the property, or for any damage or injury to the property vest at once in the new board.

(2)  The new board may bring and maintain actions to recover, protect, and preserve the property and rights of the district schools and to enforce contracts.

(3)  The new board shall assume and be liable for all outstanding debts and obligations of each of the former school districts.

(4)  All of the bonded indebtedness, outstanding debts, and obligations of a former district, which cannot be reasonably paid from the assets of the former district, shall be paid by a special tax levied by the new board as needed.  The tax shall be levied upon the property within the former district which was liable for the indebtedness at the time of consolidation.  If bonds are approved in the new district under Section 53A-18-102, the special tax shall be discontinued and the bonded indebtedness paid as any other bonded indebtedness of the new district.

(5)  Bonded indebtedness of a former district which has been refunded shall be paid in the same manner as that which the new district assumes under Section 53A-18-101.

(6)  State funds received by the new district under Section 53A-21-202 may be applied toward the payment of outstanding bonded indebtedness of a former district in the same proportion as the bonded indebtedness of the territory within the former district bears to the total bonded indebtedness of the districts combined.



Amended by Chapter 236, 2008 General Session

